Utah statutes.
70A-7a-506.   Delivery without indorsement -- Right to compel indorsement.
The transferee of a negotiable tangible document of title has a specifically
enforceable right to have its transferor supply any necessary indorsement, but
the transfer becomes a negotiation only as of the time the indorsement is
supplied.
